Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.105

Exemptions from personal liability.

The members of the governing body of a county, employees of a county, and board members, executives, and employees under this chapter are not personally liable as a result of exercising any rights or responsibilities granted under this chapter.

[ 2020 c 27 s 12.]